Colorado, session 2026A, HB1167.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. Appropriation to the department of regulatory
agencies for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025. In Session Laws of
Colorado 2025, section 2 of chapter 476, (SB 25-206), amend Part XIX as
follows:
Section 2. Appropriation.
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
PART XIX
DEPARTMENT OF REGULATORY AGENCIES
(1) EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR'S OFFICE AND ADMINISTRATIVE SERVICES
Personal Services 3,628,696 12,584 18,304a 3,597,808b
(35.7 FTE)
Health, Life, and Dental 8,296,852 242,015 7,212,369c 690,985b 151,483(I)d
9,193,761 250,492 8,071,291c 715,189b 156,789(I)d
Short-term Disability 39,778 949 34,682c 3,291b 856(I)d
Paid Family and Medical
Leave Insurance 255,711 6,100 222,954c 21,154b 5,503(I)d
Unfunded Liability
Amortization Equalization
Disbursement Payments 5,682,473 135,565 4,954,528c 470,084b 122,296(I)d
Salary Survey 1,560,895 37,265 1,360,963c 129,247b 33,420(I)d
Step Pay 250,219 5,255 215,413c 17,856b 11,695(I)d
PERA Direct Distribution 1,114,382 26,585 971,626c 92,188b 23,983(I)d
Workers' Compensation 233,543 7,078 215,273c 8,132b 3,060(I)d
Operating Expenses 182,057 2,582 66,799c 112,676b
Legal Services 17,612,668 154,241 17,241,581c 124,080b 92,766(I)d
Administrative Law Judge
Services 679,975 16,840 663,135c
Payment to Risk
Management and Property
Funds 320,147 10,777 293,579c 10,994b 4,797(I)d
Vehicle Lease Payments 754,631 754,631c
552,119 552,119c
IT Asset, Hardware, and
Software Maintenance 1,702,006 600 1,364,387c 337,019b
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1167

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
Leased Space 5,222,606 4,547,052c 497,044b 178,510(I)d
Payments to OIT 7,485,114 7,394,664c 90,450b
6,578,815 6,488,365c
CORE Operations 68,984 2,672 61,917c 3,552b 843(I)d
Consumer Outreach/
Education Program 200,000 200,000e
55,290,737
55,078,835
a Of this amount, an estimated $3,432 shall be from the Auto Dealers License Fund created in Section 44-20-133, C.R.S., an estimated $2,860 shall be from the Stationary Sources Control
Fund created in Section 25-7-114.7 (2)(b), an estimated $2,288 shall be from the Pet Animal Care and Facility Fund created in Section 35-80-116 (1), C.R.S., an estimated $1,716 shall
be from the Fire Suppression Cash Fund created in Section 24-33.5-1207.6 (1), C.R.S., an estimated $1,716 shall be from the Substance Abuse Prevention, Intervention, and Treatment
Cash Fund created in Section 18-18.5-105 (1)(a), C.R.S., an estimated $1,716 shall be from the Health Facility General Licensure Cash Fund created in Section 25-5-103.1 (1), C.R.S.,
an estimated $1,716 shall be from the License Plate Cash Fund created in Section 42-3-301 (b), C.R.S., an estimated $1,716(I) shall be from the Wildfire Risk Mitigation Grant Program
Cash Fund created in Section 23-31-310 (8.5)(a), C.R.S., and an estimated $1,144 shall be from the Parks and Outdoor Recreation Cash Fund created in Section 33-10-111 (1), C.R.S.
b These amounts shall be from departmental indirect cost recoveries or the Indirect Costs Excess Recovery Fund created in Section 24-75-1401 (2), C.R.S.
c Of this amount, an estimated $16,846,365 $16,746,365 shall be from the Division of Professions and Occupations Cash Fund created in Section 12-20-105 (3), C.R.S., an estimated
$10,605,521 $10,505,521 shall be from the Fixed Utility Fund created in Section 40-2-114 (1)(b)(II), C.R.S., an estimated $7,749,389 $7,699,500 shall be from the Division of Insurance
Cash Fund created in Section 10-1-103 (3), C.R.S., an estimated $4,041,114 shall be from the Division of Real Estate Cash Fund created in Section 12-10-215 (2)(b), C.R.S., an estimated
$2,258,799 shall be from the Division of Banking Cash Fund created in Section 11-102-403, C.R.S., an estimated $1,986,438 shall be from the Division of Securities Cash Fund created
in Section 11-51-707 (2), C.R.S., an estimated $921,491 shall be from the Motor Carrier Cash Fund created in Section 40-2-110.5 (6), C.R.S., an estimated $712,577 shall be from the
Division of Financial Services Cash Fund created in Section 11-40-106 (2), C.R.S., an estimated $600,000 shall be from the Indirect Costs Excess Recoveries Cash Fund created in Section
24-75-1401, C.R.S., an estimated $513,196 shall be from the Prescription Drug Monitoring Cash Fund created in Section 12-280-405 (1), C.R.S., an estimated $358,087 shall be from
the Telecommunication Fixed Utility Cash Fund created in Section 40-2-114 (1)(b)(I), C.R.S., an estimated $349,580 shall be from the Legal Services Offset Cash Fund created in Section
40-7-118 (1)(a), C.R.S., an estimated $219,584 shall be from the Transportation Network Company Fund created in Section 40-10.1-607, C.R.S., an estimated $191,656 shall be from
the Conservation Cash Fund created in Section 12-15-107, C.R.S., an estimated $60,394 shall be from the Colorado Telephone Users with Disabilities Cash Fund created in Section
40-17-104, C.R.S., an estimated $58,532 shall be from the Reinsurance Cash Fund created in Section 10-16-1107 (1)(a), C.R.S., an estimated $56,095 shall be from the High Cost
Administration Cash Fund created in Section 40-15-208 (3)(a), C.R.S., an estimated $18,329 shall be from the 911 Surcharge Trust Cash Fund created in Section 29-11-102.3 (3)(c)(I),
C.R.S., an estimated $10,282 shall be from the Natural Medicine Facilitator Fund created in Section 12-170-111(2), C.R.S., and an estimated $18,124 shall be from various cash fund
sources.
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1167

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
d These amounts shall be from the Equal Employment Opportunity Commission, the U.S. Department of Housing and Urban Development, the U.S. Department of Justice, and the Health
Information Counseling and Assistance Grant Program, and are included for informational purposes only.
e Of this amount, an estimated $195,000 shall be from the Consumer Outreach and Education Cash Fund created in Section 24-34-108 (2), C.R.S., and an estimated $5,000 shall be from
the Moving Outreach Fund created in Section 40-10.1-509, C.R.S.
(2) DIVISION OF BANKING
Personal Services 5,135,697 5,135,697a
(45.0 FTE)
Operating Expenses 611,050 611,050a
Indirect Cost Assessment 470,695 470,695a
6,217,442
a These amounts shall be from the Division of Banking Cash Fund created in Section 11-102-403, C.R.S.
(3) CIVIL RIGHTS DIVISION
Personal Services
SERVICES101a 3,676,487 2,312,992 823,423a 540,072(I)b
4,306,487 2,942,992
(41.8 FTE)
Operating Expenses 191,858 140,482 51,376(I)b
Indirect Cost Assessment 113,703 113,703(I)b
3,982,048
4,612,048
a This amount shall be from statewide indirect cost recoveries.
b These amounts shall be from the Equal Employment Opportunity Commission and the U.S. Department of Housing and Urban Development and are shown for informational purposes
only.
PAGE 4-HOUSE BILL 26-1167

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
(4) OFFICE OF THE UTILITY CONSUMER ADVOCATE
Personal Services 1,592,947 1,592,947a
(14.0 FTE)
Operating Expenses 61,389 61,389a
Indirect Cost Assessment 146,438 146,438a
1,800,774
a These amounts shall be from the Public Utilities Commission Fixed Utility Fund created in Section 40-2-114 (1)(b)(II), C.R.S.
(5) DIVISION OF FINANCIAL SERVICES
Personal Services 1,620,805 1,620,805a
(15.6 FTE)
Operating Expenses 132,280 132,280a
Indirect Cost Assessment 163,175 163,175a
1,916,260
a These amounts shall be from the Division of Financial Services Cash Fund created in Section 11-40-106 (2), C.R.S.
(6) DIVISION OF INSURANCE
Personal Services 12,705,039 12,622,236a 82,803(I)b
(114.7 FTE)
Operating Expenses 399,146 399,146a
Senior Health Counseling
Program 533,253 533,253(I)b
(2.0 FTE)
Transfer to CAPCO
Administration 13,500 13,500a
PAGE 5-HOUSE BILL 26-1167

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
Colorado Reinsurance
Program 765,122 765,122c
(4.0 FTE)
Indirect Cost Assessment 1,286,779 1,241,589a 45,190(I)b
15,702,839
a Of these amounts, an estimated $14,252,229 shall be from the Division of Insurance Cash Fund created in Section 10-1-103 (3), C.R.S., and an estimated $24,242 shall be from the
Viatical Settlements Cash Fund created in Section 10-7-619, C.R.S.
b These amounts shall be from the U.S. Department of Health and Human Services and are shown for informational purposes only.
c This amount shall be from the Reinsurance Program Cash Fund created in Section 10-16-1107 (1)(a), C.R.S.
(7) PUBLIC UTILITIES COMMISSION
Personal Services 14,853,972 14,853,972a
(138.5 FTE)
Operating Expenses 575,441 575,441a
Disabled Telephone Users
Fund Payments 700,000 700,000(I)b
Transfer to Reading Services
for the Blind Cash Fund 610,000 610,000c
Colorado Commission for
the Deaf, Hard of Hearing,
and Deafblind Cash Fund 3,413,703 3,413,703c
Talking Book Library 253,381 253,381c
Colorado Bureau of
Investigation Background
Checks Pass-through 50,000 50,000a
Highway-Rail Crossing
Signalization Fund 244,800 244,800d
Colorado Electric
Transmission Authority 500,000 500,000e
PAGE 6-HOUSE BILL 26-1167

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
Indirect Cost Assessment 1,496,393 1,448,694a 47,699(I)f
22,697,690
a Of these amounts, an estimated $12,790,224 shall be from the Public Utilities Commission Fixed Utility Fund created in Section 40-2-114 (1)(b)(II), C.R.S., an estimated $2,213,958
shall be from the Public Utilities Commission Motor Carrier Fund created in Section 40-2-110.5 (6), C.R.S., an estimated $958,032 shall be from the Telecommunications Utility Fund
created in Section 40-2-114 (1)(b)(I), C.R.S., an estimated $389,907 shall be from the Transportation Network Company Fund created in Section 40-10.1-607, C.R.S., an estimated
$283,794 shall be from the Colorado Telephone Users with Disabilities Fund created in Section 40-17-104 (1), C.R.S., an estimated $213,712 shall be from the Colorado High Cost
Administration Fund created in Section 40-15-208 (3)(a), C.R.S., and an estimated $78,480 shall be from the 911 Surcharge Trust Cash Fund created in Section 29-11-102.3 (3)(c)(I),
C.R.S.
b This amount shall be from the Colorado Telephone Users with Disabilities Fund created in Section 40-17-104 (1), C.R.S., and is shown for purposes of complying with Section 20 of
Article X of the State Constitution. This money is continuously appropriated pursuant to Section 40-17-104 (1)(c), C.R.S., and is shown for informational purposes only.
c This amount shall be from the Colorado Telephone users with Disabilities Fund created in Section 40-17-104 (1), C.R.S.
d This amount shall be from the Public Utilities Commission Fixed Utility Fund created in Section 40-2-114 (1)(b)(II), C.R.S. HIGHWAY-RAIL CROSSING SIGNALIZATION FUND
CREATED IN SECTION 40-29-116 (1), C.R.S.
e This amount shall be from the Highway-Rail Crossing Signalization Fund created in Section 40-29-116 (1), C.R.S. PUBLIC UTILITIES COMMISSION FIXED UTILITY FUND CREATED IN
SECTION 40-2-114 (1)(b)(II), C.R.S.
f This amount shall be from the U.S. Department of Transportation Federal Transit Administration and is shown for informational purposes only.
(8) DIVISION OF REAL ESTATE
Personal Services 4,582,087 4,582,087a
(48.9 FTE)
Operating Expenses 148,970 148,970a
Mortgage Broker Consumer
Protection 258,745 258,745a
Indirect Cost Assessment 511,488 511,488a
5,501,290
a These amounts shall be from the Division of Real Estate Cash Fund created in Section 12-10-215 (2)(b), C.R.S.
PAGE 7-HOUSE BILL 26-1167

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
(9) DIVISION OF PROFESSIONS AND OCCUPATIONS
Personal Services 19,829,219
(240.2 FTE)
Operating Expenses 1,594,561
Payments to Department of
Health Care Policy and
Financing 14,652
Indirect Cost Assessment 2,524,796
23,963,228 23,357,446a 593,451b 12,331(I)
a Of this amount, an estimated $22,748,337 shall be from the Division of Professions and Occupations Cash Fund created in Section 12-20-105 (3), C.R.S., an estimated $488,302 shall
be from the Prescription Drug Monitoring Fund created in Section 12-280-405 (1), C.R.S., and $120,807 shall be from the Marijuana Tax Cash Fund created in Section 39-28.8-501
(1), C.R.S.
b Of this amount, $324,041 shall be transferred from the Department of Health Care Policy and Financing from the Transfers to/from Other Departments, Transfer to Department of
Regulatory Agencies for Nurse Aid Certification line item in the Executive Director's Office, and $269,410 shall be transferred from the Department of Public Health and Environment
from the Medicaid/Medicare Certification Program line item in the Health Facilities and Emergency Medical Services Division, Health Facilities Programs section.
(10) DIVISION OF SECURITIES
Personal Services 2,613,111 2,613,111a
(24.0 FTE)
Operating Expenses 93,769 93,769a
Securities Fraud Prosecution 1,501,754 1,501,754a
Indirect Cost Assessment 251,037 251,037a
4,459,671
a These amounts shall be from the Division of Securities Cash Fund created in Section 11-51-707 (2), C.R.S.
PAGE 8-HOUSE BILL 26-1167

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
(11) DIVISION OF CONSERVATION
Conservation Easement
Program Costs 478,144 478,144a
(6.2 FTE)
Indirect Cost Assessment 64,851 64,851a
542,995
a These amounts shall be from the Conservation Cash Fund created in Section 12-15-107, C.R.S.
TOTALS PART XIX
(REGULATORY
AGENCIES) $142,074,974 $3,114,582 $129,281,319a $7,623,434 $2,055,639b
$142,493,072 $3,753,059 $129,031,430a $7,647,638 $2,060,945b
a Of this amount, $701,716 contains an (I) notation.
b This amount contains an (I) notation.
FOOTNOTES -- THE FOLLOWING STATEMENTS ARE REFERENCED TO THE NUMBERED FOOTNOTES THROUGHOUT SECTION 2.
101a DEPARTMENT OF REGULATORY AGENCIES, CIVIL RIGHTS DIVISION, PERSONAL SERVICES -- IT IS THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY'S INTENT THAT THE DEPARTMENT
EXPEND ANY WORKSHARE FUNDS THAT ARE RECEIVED FROM THE U.S. DEPARTMENT OF HOUSING AND URBAN DEVELOPMENT PRIOR TO EXPENDING GENERAL
FUND APPROPRIATIONS.
PAGE 9-HOUSE BILL 26-1167

SECTION 2. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 10-HOUSE BILL 26-1167